Louisiana, session 2026, HB512.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 3:4233(A)(4) through (14) are hereby amended and reenacted and
R.S. 3:4201(24), 4210.1, and 4233(A)(15) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§4201. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, except as otherwise specified, the following terms
shall have the meanings stated below:
* * *
(24) The term "cell cultured food product" means any cultured animal tissue
produced from in vitro animal cell cultures outside of the organism from which it
derived.
* * *
§4210.1. Cell cultured food products; prohibition
A. No person, firm, or corporation shall manufacture for sale, sell, hold or
offer for sale, or distribute any cell cultured food product in this state.
B. No person, firm, or corporation shall mix any cell-cultured food product
with any "meat product", as defined by R.S. 3:4743. Such products shall not be
offered for sale as food for human consumption.
* * *
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 512 ENROLLED
§4233. Violations, penalties, injunctive relief
A. The following actions are prohibited:
* * *
(4) The manufacturing, sale, offering for sale, or distribution of any cell
cultured food product as defined in R.S. 3:4201.
(5) The removal of any condemned livestock, poultry, carcasses, parts of
carcasses, meat, or meat products from any place of detention without the prior
authorization of the commissioner.
(5) (6) The failure to maintain the required registration.
(6) (7) The making of false or misleading statements concerning eligibility
for exemptions from the requirements of this Chapter.
(7) (8) The failure to comply with the sanitary requirements provided by this
Chapter or the rules and regulations adopted under this Chapter.
(8) (9) The failure to properly destroy any condemned livestock, poultry,
carcasses, parts of carcasses, meat, or meat products.
(9) (10) The use of any label which has not been previously approved by the
commissioner.
(10) (11) The unauthorized use of any official device, brand, mark, or
certificate.
(11) (12) The failure to maintain and provide to the commissioner, upon
request, any required reports, accounts, books, or records.
(12) (13) Any assault, resistance, opposition, impedance, intimidation, or
interference with the commissioner, or his representatives, in the performance of his
duties under this Chapter.
(13) (14) The evasion of payment of any civil penalty legally imposed by the
commissioner.
(14) (15) The failure to comply with the provisions of this Chapter or of the
rules and regulations adopted under the provisions of this Chapter.
* * *
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 512 ENROLLED
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall become effective only upon a final ruling
of the Supreme Court of the United States holding that prohibitions on cell cultured food
products do not violate the United States Constitution; however, nothing in this Act,
regardless of whether such ruling is issued, shall be construed to prohibit accredited
institutions of higher education in this state from conducting research on cell cultured food
products.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.